Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.300

Archaeological sites.

(1) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of such sites are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

(2) Records, maps, and other information, acquired during watershed analysis pursuant to the forests and fish report under RCW 76.09.370, that identify the location of archaeological sites, historic sites, artifacts, or the sites of traditional religious, ceremonial, or social uses and activities of affected Indian tribes, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter in order to prevent the looting or depredation of such sites.

(3) Any site form, report, specific fields and tables relating to site form data within a database, or geographic information systems spatial layer obtained by any state agency or local government, or shared between any state agency, local government, or tribal government, is exempt from disclosure under this chapter, if the material is related to:

(a) An archaeological site as defined in RCW 27.53.030;

(b) Historical [Historic] archaeological resources as defined in RCW 27.53.030; or

(c) Traditional cultural places.

(4) The local government or agency shall respond to requests from the owner of the real property for public records exempt under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section by providing information to the requestor on how to contact the department of archaeology and historic preservation to obtain available locality information on archaeological and cultural resources.

[ 2014 c 165 s 1; 2006 c 86 s 1; 2005 c 274 s 410.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 86: "This act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 86 s 2.]